District of Columbia statutes.
38-2805

Reform implementation plans.

The Superintendent shall, by October 15, 1998, provide a detailed Implementation Plan for each component of the General Education Reforms, the Special Education Reforms, and the Central Administration Reforms that will be contained in the Fiscal Year 1999 budget. This Implementation Plan shall specifically state the number and specific occupation positions that will be added and deleted in order to implement each component of the Implementation Plan.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1106, 45 DCR 7193
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-267, § 3, 46 DCR 960
1981 Ed., § 31-155.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 12-211 substituted “October 15, 1998” for “September 15, 1998.”
Section 9 of D.C. Law 12-211 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary amendment of section, see §§ 2 and 3 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-480, October 28, 1998, 45 DCR 8016), and §§ 2 and 3 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-4, February 8, 1999, 46 DCR 2291).
For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 38-2801.
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 1B 1981 Ed., see notes following § 38-2801.